Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.105

Braille instruction—Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply in RCW 28A.155.115.

(1) "Student" means a student who:

(a) Has a visual acuity of 20/200 or less in the better eye with conventional correction or having a limited field of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angular distance not greater than twenty degrees;

(b) Is unable to read printed material at a competitive rate with facility due to functional visual impairment or lack of visual acuity; or

(c) Has a physical condition with a medical prognosis of a significant visual deterioration to the extent that (a) or (b) of this subsection could apply.

(2) "Braille" means the system of reading and writing through touch commonly known as standard English Braille.

[ 1996 c 135 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—1996 c 135: "It is the goal of the legislature to encourage persons who are blind or visually impaired to participate fully in the social and economic life of the state and to engage in remunerative employment. The legislature finds that literacy is essential to the achievement of this goal. Furthermore, the legislature finds that literacy for most persons who are blind or visually impaired means the ability to read and write Braille with proficiency. The legislature sets as a further goal that students who are legally blind or visually impaired shall be given the opportunity to learn Braille in order to communicate effectively and efficiently." [ 1996 c 135 s 1.]